Hawaii, session 2026, GM1298.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that image-based sexual
abuse is a form of technology-facilitated abuse that involves
the nonconsensual use of intimate or private images to control,
manipulate, or harm a victim. Online predators, often motivated
by money, power, control, or sexual gratification, use online
platforms to anonymously perpetrate image-based sexual abuse,
targeting vulnerable individuals to meet the perpetrator's
demands for money, sexual acts, and additional intimate or
private images, which can include images of self-harm.
Financial blackmail schemes involving sexual extortion through
the nonconsensual disclosure of intimate or private images
result in tragic and, at times, fatal results for the victims of
these schemes and may cause victims to experience significant
harm, including depression, fear, anxiety, damage to reputation,
social isolation, financial devastation, and suicide.
The legislature further finds that offender accountability
is necessary to shine the light on those who would hide behind
2026-2442 SB2135 GDI SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiMiiiiiniiniiiM

Page 2
S.B. NO. S?.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
computers, mobile phones, or other electronic devices to prey
upon vulnerable individuals in the community.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish the
felony offense of nonconsensual disclosure of intimate or
private images.
SECTION 2. Chapter 711, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
"§711- Nonconsensual disclosure of intimate or private
images. (1) A person commits the offense of nonconsensual
disclosure of intimate or private images if:
(a) The person intentionally or knowingly discloses or
threatens to disclose an intimate or private image of
another identifiable person without the consent of the
depicted person, with intent to compel or attempt to
compel the depicted person:
(i) To do or refrain from doing any act against the
person's will;
(ii) To provide additional intimate or private images;
(iii) To engage in sexual acts;
(iv) To engage in acts of self-harm;
2026-2442 SB2135 CDl SMA.docx
lllliimillHHIlWlilllilll

Page 3 S.B. NO. S?*
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(v) For anything of value; or
(vi) To affect any family court proceeding in which
the depicted person is a party;
(b) The person intentionally or knowingly discloses or
threatens to disclose an intimate or private image of
another identifiable person without the consent of the
depicted person, and the depicted person;
(i) Is a minor or vulnerable adult and the person
committing the offense is an adult; or
(ii) Suffers bodily injury; or
(c) The person intentionally or knowingly discloses or
threatens to disclose an intimate or private image of
another identifiable person without the consent of the
depicted person, and the nonconsensual disclosure of
the intimate or private image was the proximate cause
of the death of the depicted person.
(2) Nonconsensual disclosure of intimate or private images
shall be a class B felony.
(3) For the purposes of this section:
"Affect" means to influence or produce a change.
"Bodily injury" has the same meaning as in section 707-700.
2026-2442 SB2135 CDl SMA.docx
iiiiiiimiiiiniiiiiinii

Page 4 2135
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Family court proceeding" means any proceeding involving;
(a) A child custody or child support proceeding under
chapter 571;
(b) An annulment, divorce, or separation under chapter
580;
(c) A temporary restraining order under section 586-4; or
(d) A protective order under section 586-5.5.
"Intimate image" means any digital image, photograph,
computer-generated image or video, or live or recorded video
that depicts a person in the nude, as defined in section
712-1210, or engaged in sexual conduct, as defined in section
712-1210.
"Minor" means any person under the age of eighteen years.
"Private image" means any digital image, photograph,
computer-generated image or video, or live or recorded video
that depicts a person committing acts of self-harm, self-
mutilation, or other self-injury that results in bodily injury.
"Self-harm" means bodily injury; substantial bodily injury,
as de f iuied iui 207j22.002 s^rious boddAy in22jry j as defined ijn
section 707-700; or death.
2026-2442 SB2135 CDl SMA.docx

MWiwiiiiiMMiinniiiiiiiii

Page 5 2135
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
"Vulnerable adult" has the same meaning as in section
346-222."
SECTION 3. Section 706-662, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§706-662 Criteria for extended terms of isprisonment. A
defendant who has been convicted of a felony may be subject to
an extended term of imprisonment under section 706-661 if it is
proven beyond a reasonable doubt that an extended term of
imprisonment is necessary for the protection of the public and
that the convicted defendant satisfies one or more of the
following criteria:
(1) The defendant is a persistent offender in that the
defendant has previously been convicted of two or more
felonies committed at different times when the
defendant was twenty-one years of age or older;
(2) The defendant is a professional criminal in that:
(a) The circumstances of the crime show that the
defendant has knowingly engaged in criminal
activity as a major source of livelihood; or
2026-2442 SB2135 CDl SMA.docx 5
iniiiiiiiniMiiiiiniHH

Page 6 2135
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(b) The defendant has substantial income or resources
not explained to be derived from a source other
than criminal activity;
(3) The defendant is a dangerous person in that the
defendant has been subjected to a psychiatric or
psychological evaluation that documents a significant
history of dangerousness to others resulting in
criminally violent conduct, and this history makes the
defendant a serious danger to others. Nothing in this
section precludes the introduction of victim-related
data to establish dangerousness in accord with the
Hawaii rules of evidence;
(4) The defendant is a multiple offender in that:
(a) The defendant is being sentenced for two or more
felonies or is already under sentence of
imprisonment for any felony; or
(b) The maximum terms of imprisonment authorized for
each of the defendant's crimes, if made to run
consecutively, would equal or exceed in length
the maximum of the extended term imposed or would
2026-2442 SB2135 GDI SMA.docx
iHiiNiiminiiiMiniiii

Page 7
S.B. NO.
• • h.D. 1
C.D. 1
equal or exceed forty years if the extended term
imposed is for a class A felony;
(5) The defendant is an offender against the elderly, the
handicapped, or a minor eight years of age or younger
in that:
(a) The defendant attempts or commits any of the
following crimes: murder, manslaughter, a sexual
offense that constitutes a felony under chapter
707, robbery, felonious assault, burglary, or
kidnapping; and
(b) The defendant, in the course of committing or
attempting to commit the crime, inflicts serious
or substantial bodily injury upon a person who
has the status of being:
(i) Sixty years of age or older;
(ii) Blind, a paraplegic, or a quadriplegic; or
(iii) Eight years of age or younger; and
the person's status is known or reasonably should
be known to the defendant;
(6) The defendant is a hate crime offender in that:
2026-2442 SB2135 GDI SMA.docx
IDWIiniHMMIBIBOHIIIIIIIIII

Page 8
S.B. NO.
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
(a) The defendant is convicted of a crime under
chapter 101, 108, or 711; and
(b) The defendant intentionally selected a victim or,
in the case of a property crime, the property
that was the object of a crime, because of
hostility toward the actual or perceived race,
religion, disability, ethnicity, national origin,
gender identity or expression, or sexual
orientation of any person. For purposes of this
subsection, "gender identity or expression"
includes a person's actual or perceived gender,
as well as a person's gender identity, gender-
related self-image, gender-related appearance, or
gender-related expression, regardless of whether
that gender identity, gender-related self-image,
gender-related appearance, or gender-related
expression is different from that traditionally
associated with the person's sex at birth; [ea?]
(7) The defendant is convicted under section 707-702.5 and
the defendant did not remain at the scene of the crime
and render reasonable assistance to an injured person,
2026-2442 SB2135 GDI SMA.docx
iiiiiiiiiniiiii'iMaiiiitiiKiiei

Page 9
S.B. NO.
-2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
including acts and omissions in violation of section
291C-12[^]; or
(8) The defendant is an offender against a minor eighteen
years of age or younger or a vulnerable adult, as
defined under section 346-222, in that;
(a) The defendant attempts to commit or commits the
offense of nonconsensual disclosure of intimate
or private images under section 711- ; and
(b) The attempted commission or commission of the
nonconsensual disclosure of the intimate or
private image was the proximate cause of the
death of the minor or vulnerable adult."
SECTION 4. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 5. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
2026-2442 SB2135 CDl SMA.docx 9
HIIHItllllOIEIIIIIIIIIirillll

2135
S.B. NO.
S.D. 2
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 7th day of July , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B. No. 2135, S.D. 2, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
resident of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
6-26

SB No. 2135, SD 2, HD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives